test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kuelae35_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - külä: # Noun (35) külä 'eng village/est /fin' - full paradigm
     külä+N+Sg+Nom: külä
     külä+N+Sg+Gen: külä
     külä+N+Sg+Par: küllä
     külä+N+Sg+Ill: küllä
     külä+N+Sg+Ine: [külän, küläh, külähn]
     külä+N+Sg+Ela: küläst
     külä+N+Sg+All: küläle
     külä+N+Sg+Ade: küläl
     külä+N+Sg+Abl: külält
     külä+N+Sg+Tra: küläs
     külä+N+Sg+Ter: küläniq
     külä+N+Sg+Abe: küläldäq
     külä+N+Sg+Com: külägaq
     külä+N+Pl+Nom: küläq
     külä+N+Pl+Gen: külli
     külä+N+Pl+Par: külli
     külä+N+Pl+Ill: [küllihe, külli]
     külä+N+Pl+Ine: [külin, külih, külihn, küllin, küllih, küllihn]
     külä+N+Pl+Ela: [külist, küllist]
     külä+N+Pl+All: [külile, küllile]
     külä+N+Pl+Ade: [külil, küllil]
     külä+N+Pl+Abl: [külilt, küllilt]
     külä+N+Pl+Tra: [külis, küllis]
     külä+N+Pl+Ter: [küliniq, külliniq]
     külä+N+Pl+Abe: [külildäq, küllildäq]
     külä+N+Pl+Com: külligaq
